v1.1/old/guesser.foma
define ModifyTE "–"  -> 0 || V ("*") ("*") MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols*       _    ∘
                "~f" -> 0 || t e ("*") ("*") MorphemeBoundary ["@*" | "@₁" | "@₂"]  _    ∘
                ":"  -> 0 || t e ("*") ("*") MorphemeBoundary ["@*" | "@₁" | "@₂"] "~" _ ∘
                t e "*" "*" -> l || _ MorphemeBoundary "@*"                              ∘  ! for strongly special te's
                t e         -> s || V _ MorphemeBoundary ("@*") "@₂" MorphPhonSymbols* k ,, ! for postbases that begin with velars
                t e ("*")   -> t || V _ MorphemeBoundary ("@*") "@₂" MorphPhonSymbols* k ,, 
                t e "*"     -> l || _ MorphemeBoundary "@*"                              ,, ! for weakly special te's
                t e "*"     -> s || _ MorphemeBoundary "@*"                              ∘
                "*" ("*")   -> 0 || t e _                                                ∘
                l gh -> ll ghh || t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" _                            ∘ ! for postbase @–lghii
                [..] -> e      || C t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" ll _ ghh                   ∘
                [..] -> n e gh || t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* ng h _     ∘ ! for postbase @–nghite
                ng h -> 0      || t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ n e gh   ∘ 
                t e ("*") -> s || _ MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* i            ∘ ! for postbases that begin with i 
                [..] -> ll   || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ l        ∘ ! for postbases that begin with apicals
                l    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* ll _       ∘
                [..] -> nn   || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ n        ∘
                n    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* nn _       ∘
                [..] -> rr   || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ r        ∘
                r    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* rr _       ∘
                [..] -> s    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ [y | z]  ∘
                y    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* s _        ∘
                e    -> 0    || V t _ MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [ m | v ]  ∘ ! for postbases that begin with labials
                v    -> f    || C t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _          ∘
                l    -> ll   || [g | gh | ghw | r] t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _       ∘ ! Undoubling Rule 3
                g    -> gg   || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                gh   -> ghh  || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                ghw  -> ghhw || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                l    -> ll   || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                r    -> rr   || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                t e  -> 0    || _ MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* "@₁"                ∘ ! drop base-final te
                "@*" -> 0, 
                "@₁" -> 0,
                "@₂" -> 0    || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*)  _  ;

define ResolveAllomorphy ["(g/t)" | "(g)"] -> g || V V MorphemeBoundary [("~f") | ("~")] _        ∘
                         ["(g/t)" | "(t)"] -> t ||   C MorphemeBoundary ("~f") _                  ∘
                         "(ng₁)" -> "ng"        ||   V ("*") MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _ ∘
                         "(s/z)" -> s || C ("*") MorphemeBoundary _         ∘
                         "(s/z)" -> z || V       MorphemeBoundary _         ∘                                 
                         "(p/v)" -> p || C ("*") MorphemeBoundary ("~f") _  ∘
                         "(p/v)" -> v || V       MorphemeBoundary ("~f") _  ∘
                         "(t/y)" -> t || C ("*") MorphemeBoundary _         ∘
                         "(t/y)" -> y || V       MorphemeBoundary _         ∘
                         "(pete)fte" -> p e t e f t e MorphemeBoundary || C ("*") _  ,,
                         "(pete)fte" -> p e t e       MorphemeBoundary || C ("*") _  ∘ 
                         "(pete)fte" -> f t e         MorphemeBoundary || V       _  ∘
                         "(te)"  -> t e  || C ("*") MorphemeBoundary _                                  ∘
                         "(i₁)"  -> i    || e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _                      ∘
                         "(i₂)"  -> i    || [Alphabet - t] e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _       ∘
                         "(i/u)" -> i    || t e ("*") MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _              ∘
                         "(i/u)" -> u    || [Alphabet - t] e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _       ∘
                         "(i/u)" -> u    || [Alphabet - FullVowel] MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _ ∘
                         "(u)"   -> u    || [Alphabet - FullVowel] MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _ ∘
                         "(ng₂)" -> "ng" || FullVowel MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _              ∘
                         "(a)"   -> a    || e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _                      ∘
                         "(s)"   -> s    || V MorphemeBoundary _                                        ∘
                         "(at)"  -> a t  || t MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _                      ∘
                         "(at)"  -> a t  || [C - t] (V) MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _            ∘
                         "(g/t)" -> 0,
                         "(g)"   -> 0,
                         "(te)"  -> 0,
                         "(t)"   -> 0,
                         "(ng₁)" -> 0,
                         "(s/z)" -> 0,
                         "(p/v)" -> 0,
                         "(t/y)" -> 0,
                         "(i₁)"  -> 0,
                         "(i₂)"  -> 0,
                         "(i/u)" -> 0,
                         "(u)"   -> 0,
                         "(ng₂)" -> 0,
                         "(a)"   -> 0,
                         "(s)"   -> 0,
                         "(at)"  -> 0   || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*) _  ;

define UvularDropping gh MorphemeBoundary ":" e -> a MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] a _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" e -> i MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] i _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" e -> u MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] u _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" a -> a MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" i -> i MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" u -> u MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ ∘
                                                  ":"   -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ MorphemeBoundary _ ;

define VelarUvularRounding k -> kw, g -> w, gg -> wh, ng -> ngw, ngng -> ngngw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) i (MorphemeBoundary) ∘
                           k -> kw, g -> w, gg -> wh, ng -> ngw, ngng -> ngngw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) a (MorphemeBoundary) ∘
                                     h -> h w, q -> qw, gh -> ghw, ghh -> ghhw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) i (MorphemeBoundary) ∘
                                     h -> h w, q -> qw, gh -> ghw, ghh -> ghhw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) a (MorphemeBoundary) ∘
                                    ["(g/t)" | "(g)" | g ] -> w || a u MorphemeBoundary (MorphemeBoundary) MorphPhonSymbols* _ [ V - u] ;

define TripleCluster V -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet+ [ V - e ] MorphemeBoundary "~" "(g)" _ V  ∘  ! for [Trns][Ind]
                     FullVowel -> 0 || FullVowel _ FullVowel                                    ∘
					        gh -> 0 || [ g | gh ] t e ("*") ("*") MorphemeBoundary "@₁" "–" _   ;  ! for @–ghpagte

define VowelDominance a i -> i i  ∘
                      i a -> i i  ∘
                      u i -> i i  ∘
                      i u -> i i  ∘
                      a u -> a a  ∘
                      u a -> a a  ∘
                      e i -> i    ∘
                      e a -> a    ∘
                      e u -> u    ;

define GKa "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" ->  "~" "–" k || C _              ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" ->      "~" k || FullVowel _      ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" -> "@*" "~" k || t e "*" ("*") _  ,, 
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" -> "@₂" "~" k || t e "*" ("*") _  ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" -> "@₂" "~" k || V t e _          ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" ->          k || C t e _          ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" ->  "~sf" g k ||     e _          ,, 
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" ->     "~f" k ||     e _          ∘ 
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" ->    "~" g k || "(pete)fte" MorphemeBoundary _ ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" "[Cond]" ->          0                                   ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" ->  "~" "–" k a || C _              ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" ->      "~" k a || FullVowel _      ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" -> "@*" "~" k a || t e "*" ("*") _  ∘ 
           "@~–(g)ka" -> "@₂" "~" k a || V t e _          ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" ->          k a || C t e _          ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" ->  "~sf" g k a ||     e _          ,, 
           "@~–(g)ka" ->     "~f" k a ||     e _          ∘ 
           "@~–(g)ka" ->    "~" g k a || "(pete)fte" MorphemeBoundary _ ∘
           "@~–(g)ka" ->            0                                   ;

define GKe "@~–(g)ke" ->          k a || "@₁" "~f" n a _ ng                                 ∘ ! for [Trns][Fut][Opt]
           "@~–(g)ke" ->          k e || "@₁" "~f" n a _ [Alphabet - ng]                    ∘ ! for [Trns][Fut][Opt]
           "@~–(g)ke" ->  "~" "–" k a || C _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]             ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" ->  "~" "–" k e || C _                                                ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" ->      "~" k a || FullVowel _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]     ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" ->      "~" k e || FullVowel _                                        ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" -> "@*" "~" k a || t e "*" ("*") _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng] ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" -> "@*" "~" k e || t e "*" ("*") _                                    ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" -> "@₂" "~" k a || V t e _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]         ,, 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->        g k a || V t e _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]         ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" -> "@₂" "~" k e || V t e _                                            ,, 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->        g k e || V t e _                                            ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" ->          k a || C t e _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]         ,, 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->        g k a || C t e _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]         ∘ 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->          k e || C t e _                                            ,, 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->        g k e || C t e _                                            ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" ->  "~sf" g k a ||     e _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]         ,, 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->   "~f"   k a ||     e _ (MorphPhonSymbols*) ["(ng₁)" | ng]         ∘ 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->  "~sf" g k e ||     e _                                            ,, 
           "@~–(g)ke" ->   "~f"   k e ||     e _                                            ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" ->    "~" g k e || "(pete)fte" MorphemeBoundary _ ∘
           "@~–(g)ke" ->            0                                   ;
